Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0635.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Assessment" means the amount levied against an owner under this act. (b) "Assessment revenues" means the money collected by a regional marketing organization from the assessment, including any interest and penalties on the assessment, imposed under this act. (c) "Board" means the board of directors elected by the members of a regional marketing organization. (d) "Director" means the president of the Michigan strategic fund or his or her director of the bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act or the director's designee. (e) "Master plan" means the comprehensive, long-range master plan developed by the Michigan travel commission and the travel bureau under section 2c of the Michigan tourism policy act, 1945 PA 106, MCL 2.102c. (f) "Owner" means the owner of a transient facility that is located within the regional assessment district or, if the transient facility is operated or managed by a person other than the owner, then the operator or manager of that transient facility. Owner includes a person electing to come under the provisions of this act pursuant to section 9. (g) "Regional assessment district" means a region of this state composed of a number of counties in which a regional marketing organization operates. Regional assessment district does not include a portion of the region that is a special charter, fourth class city. (h) "Regional marketing organization" means a nonprofit corporation that promotes tourism within a region of this state. Regional marketing organization includes only an organization that has been operating for 10 or more years and that operates in a region composed of 15 counties. (i) "Room" means a room or other space provided for sleeping that can be rented independently, including the furnishings and other accessories in the room. Room includes, but is not limited to, a condominium or time-sharing unit that, pursuant to a management agreement, may be used to provide dwelling, lodging, or sleeping quarters for a transient guest. (j) "Room charge" means the charge imposed for the use or occupancy of a room, excluding charges for food, beverages, state use tax, telephone service, or like services paid in connection with the room charge, and reimbursement of the assessment as allowed in section 6. (k) "Transient facility" means a building or combination of buildings under common ownership, operation, or management that contains 10 or more rooms used in the business of providing dwelling, lodging, or sleeping to transient guests, whether or not membership is required for the use of the rooms. Transient facility includes a building or combination of buildings, the owner of which has elected to come under the provisions of this act pursuant to section 9. Transient facility does not include a any of the following: (i) A college or school dormitory. ; a (ii) A hospital. ; a (iii) A nursing home. ; a (iv) A hospice. ; (v) Except as otherwise elected under section 9, a building or combination of buildings that is otherwise a transient facility, but that is located within 1 mile of a ski lift as defined in section 2 of the ski area safety act of 1962, 1962 PA 199, MCL 408.322. ; or a (vi) A facility owned and operated by an organization qualified for an exemption from federal taxation under section 501(c) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501. (l) "Transient guest" means a natural person who occupies a room in a transient facility for less than 30 consecutive days regardless of who pays the room charge. (m) "Tourism marketing program" means a program established by a regional marketing organization to develop, encourage, solicit, and promote tourism within a region of this state. The encouragement and promotion of tourism includes a service, function, or activity, whether or not performed, sponsored, or advertised by a regional marketing organization, that intends to attract transient guests to the regional assessment district. (n) "Tourism marketing program notice" means the notice described in section 3. (o) "Travel bureau" means the Michigan travel bureau created under section 2a of the Michigan tourism policy act, 1945 PA 106, MCL 2.102a, and renamed Travel Michigan by Executive Reorganization Order No. 1997-1, MCL 2.111. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 631 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.